Massachusetts, session 194th, H4143.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Notwithstanding clause forty-first A of section 5 of chapter 59 of the
General Laws or any general or special law to the contrary, the town of Wellesley may, by vote
of its Select Board, adopt a maximum qualifying gross receipts amount in excess of the
limitation set forth in said clause forty-first A; provided, however, that such maximum qualifying
gross receipts amount shall not exceed the income limit determined by the commissioner of
revenue for the purposes of subsection (k) of section 6 of chapter 62 of the General Laws for
married persons filing jointly, regardless of the taxpayer’s marital status.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon its passage.
of 1